District of Columbia statutes.
29A-925

Repealed

Share and membership certificates; issuance and contents.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 485, ch. 397, § 25
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-825.
1981 Ed., § 29-1125.
2001 Ed., § 29-925.